Utah statutes.
58-15-11.   Exceptions to chapter.

In addition to the exemptions in Section 58-1-307, this chapter does not apply to facilities of any recognized church or denomination that cares for the sick and suffering by mental or spiritual means if no drug or material remedy is used in the care provided.  Any facilities exempted under this section shall comply with each statute and rule on sanitation and life safety.



Amended by Chapter 297, 1993 General Session

